Missouri, session 2026, HB2913.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.1075, to read as follows:
160.1075. 1. A teacher, as defined in section 163.011, while fulfilling duties or
performing services on behalf of a school district or charter school, may intervene in an
incident involving violence in order to safeguard himself or herself or a student.
2. A teacher shall be held harmless and immune from any liability for actions
described under subsection 1 of this section if:
(1) In the course of intervening in such incident, the teacher follows any
procedures adopted by the school district or charter school, if any; or
(2) The teacher intervenes in good faith and in a manner that the teacher
reasonably believes is afforded the defense of justification under chapter 563.
3. A school district or charter school shall be held harmless and immune from
any liability for the actions described under subsection 1 of this section by a teacher
fulfilling duties or performing services for the school district or charter school so long as
the teacher complies with the provisions of this section.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to protect a teacher from suit or
liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by willful and wanton
misconduct or gross negligence of the teacher.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2913 & 3228 2
5. No school district or charter school shall implement policies that prevent a
teacher from protecting himself or herself or a student.
✔